ro-RO: Categoria de dimensiune a plăcii: Little League; Oficial/Regulamentar; Softball Fastpitch; Softball Slowpitch; Antrenament/Practică; Tineret; Altele
th: หมวดหมู่ขนาดจาน: ลิตเติ้ลลีก; อย่างเป็นทางการ/ตามกฎระเบียบ; ซอฟต์บอลฟาสต์พิตช์; ซอฟต์บอลสโลว์พิตช์; ฝึกซ้อม/ฝึกหัด; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
fi: Levyn kokoluokka: Little League; Virallinen/säännönmukainen; Softball (fastpitch); Softball (slowpitch); Harjoittelu/treeni; Nuoriso; Muu
cs: Kategorie velikosti desky: Malá liga; Oficiální / předepsaná velikost; Softball fastpitch; Softball slowpitch; Tréninková/cvičná; Mládežnická; Jiné
pt-BR: Anilha, categoria de tamanho: Little League; Oficial/regulamentar; Softball Fastpitch; Softball Slowpitch; Treino/prática; Juvenil; Outro
da: Størrelseskategori for plade: Lilleputliga; Officiel/standard; Softball (fastpitch); Softball (slowpitch); Træning/øvelse; Unge; Andet
zh-CN: 垒板尺寸类别: 少棒联盟; 官方/标准; 垒球快投; 垒球慢投; 训练/练习; 青年; 其他
ja: プレートサイズカテゴリー: リトルリーグ; 公式/規定; ソフトボールファストピッチ; ソフトボールスローピッチ; トレーニング/練習用; ユース; その他
it: Categoria di taglia della piastra: Little League; Ufficiale/regolamentare; Softball fastpitch; Softball slowpitch; Allenamento/pratica; Ragazzi; Altro
tr: Plaka boyut kategorisi: Little League; Resmi/nizami; Softbol (Hızlı Atış); Softbol (Yavaş Atış); Eğitim/antrenman; Genç; Diğer
fr: Catégorie de taille de plaque: Little League; Officiel/réglementaire; Softball fastpitch; Softball slowpitch; Entraînement/pratique; Jeunes; Autre
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους πλακέτας: Little League; Επίσημο/κανονικό; Σόφτμπολ γρήγορης ρίψης (Fastpitch); Σόφτμπολ αργής ρίψης (Slowpitch); Προπόνησης/εξάσκησης; Νέων; Άλλο
nb: Størrelseskategori for plate: Little League; Offisiell/turnering; Softball (fastpitch); Softball (slowpitch); Trening; Ungdom; Annet
sk-SK: Kategória veľkostí platní: Little League; Oficiálne/predpisové; Softbal Fastpitch; Softbal Slowpitch; Tréningové/cvičné; Mládežnícke; Iné
zh-TW: 板材尺寸分類: 少棒; 官方/正規; 快速壘球; 慢速壘球; 訓練/練習; 青少年; 其他
de: Größenkategorie der Plate: Little League; Offiziell/Regulär; Softball Fastpitch; Softball Slowpitch; Training/Übung; Jugend; Sonstige
pl: Kategoria rozmiaru płyty: Little League; Oficjalna; Softball (fastpitch); Softball (slowpitch); Treningowa; Dla młodzieży; Inny
en: Plate size category: Little League; Official/Regulation; Softball Fastpitch; Softball Slowpitch; Training/Practice; Youth; Other
es: Categoría de tamaño de la placa: Ligas menores; Oficial/reglamentario; Sóftbol de lanzamiento rápido; Sóftbol de lanzamiento lento; Entrenamiento/práctica; Jóvenes; Otro
ko: 플레이트 크기 범주: 리틀 리그; 공식/규정; 소프트볼 패스트피치; 소프트볼 슬로우피치; 훈련/연습용; 유소년용; 기타
sl-SI: Kategorija velikosti plošče: Little League; Uradno/predpisano; Softball (hitri met); Softball (počasni met); Za trening/vajo; Mladinsko; Drugo
nl: Categorie plaatformaat: Little League; Officieel/reglementair; Softbal fastpitch; Softbal slowpitch; Training/oefening; Jeugd; Overig
ru: Категория размера пластины: Малая лига; Официальная/стандартная; Софтбол (фастпитч); Софтбол (слоупитч); Тренировочная; Юношеская; Другое
bg-BG: Категория размер на плочата: Малка лига; Официален/Стандартен размер; Софтбол фастпич; Софтбол слоупич; За тренировка/практика; За младежи; Друго
hu: Lemezméret kategóriája: Little League; Hivatalos/szabványos; Fastpitch softball; Slowpitch softball; Edzés/gyakorlás; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
lt-LT: Plokštelės dydžio kategorija: Vaikų lygos; Oficialus / reglamentuotas; Sofbolo (greitas padavimas); Sofbolo (lėtas padavimas); Treniruočių / praktikos; Jaunimo; Kita
pt-PT: Categoria de tamanho das plataformas: Liga infantil; Oficial/regulamentar; Softball lançamento rápido; Softball lançamento lento; Treino/prática; Jovem; Outro
vi: Loại kích thước đĩa: Little League; Chính thức/Quy định; Bóng mềm ném nhanh; Bóng mềm ném chậm; Đào tạo/Thực hành; Thanh thiếu niên; Khác
sv: Tallriksstorlekskategori: Little League; Officiell/standard; Softball (fastpitch); Softball (slowpitch); Träning/övning; Ungdom; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kategorija veličine ploče: Dječja liga; Službeno / prema propisima; Softball Fastpitch; Softball Slowpitch; Za trening/vježbu; Za mlade; Ostalo